Louisiana, session 2026, HB82.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:98.2(D)(introductory paragraph), 98.3(A)(1) and (C), and
98.4(A)(1), (C), and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 14:98.3(D) and 98.4(E)
are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§98.2. Operating while impaired; second offense; penalties
* * *
D. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, on a
conviction of a second offense violation of R.S. 14:98, and regardless of whether the
second offense occurred before or after the first conviction, when the first offense
was for the crime of vehicular homicide in violation of R.S. 14:32.1, third degree
feticide in violation of R.S. 14:32.8, or first degree vehicular negligent injuring in
violation of R.S. 14:39.2, or an equivalent law or laws of any state, the offender shall
be fined two thousand dollars and imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not less
than one year two years nor more than five years. At least six months one year of
the sentence of imprisonment imposed shall be without benefit of parole, probation,
or suspension of sentence except sentence. Except in compliance with R.S.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 82 ENROLLED
14:98.5(B)(1), the mandatory minimum sentence cannot shall not be served on home
incarceration.
* * *
§98.3. Operating while impaired; third offense; penalties
A.(1) Except as provided in Subsection B Subsections B and C of this
Section, on a conviction of a third offense violation of R.S. 14:98, regardless of
whether the third offense occurred before or after a previous conviction, the offender
shall be fined two thousand dollars and shall be imprisoned, with or without hard
labor, for not less than one year nor more than five years. Except as provided in
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, at least one year of the sentence imposed shall be
served without benefit of parole, probation, or suspension of sentence. Except in
compliance with R.S. 14:98.5(B)(1), the mandatory minimum sentence cannot be
served on home incarceration.
* * *
C.(1) If the offender has previously been convicted for the crime of vehicular
homicide in violation of R.S. 14:32.1, third degree feticide in violation of R.S.
14:32.8, or first degree vehicular negligent injuring in violation of R.S. 14:39.2, or
an equivalent law or laws of any state, then on a conviction of a third or subsequent
offense violation of R.S. 14:98, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary and regardless of whether the offense occurred before or after an earlier
conviction, the offender shall be fined two thousand dollars and imprisoned, with or
without hard labor, for not less than five nor more than fifteen years. At least five
years of the sentence imposed shall be served without benefit of parole, probation,
or suspension of sentence. Except in compliance with R.S. 14:98.5(B)(1), the
mandatory minimum sentence shall not be served on home incarceration.
(2) Except where inconsistent with the provisions of this Subsection, the
conditions of probation include but are not limited to the conditions of probation
provided by Paragraph (A)(3) of this Section, except that the offender shall not be
sentenced to substance abuse treatment provided for by Items (A)(3)(b)(i) and (ii)
of this Section. Nothing in this Section prohibits the court from ordering substance
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 82 ENROLLED
abuse treatment if it determines that the offender is able to pay for the substance
abuse treatment.
C. D. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order, upon motion of
the prosecuting district attorney, that the vehicle being operated by the offender at
the time of the offense be seized and impounded, and sold at auction in accordance
with the provisions of R.S. 14:98(F).
§98.4. Operating while impaired; fourth offense; penalties
A.(1) Except as modified by Subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this Paragraph, or
as provided by Subsections B and C B, C, and D of this Section, on a conviction of
a fourth or subsequent offense violation of R.S. 14:98, regardless of whether the
fourth offense occurred before or after an earlier conviction, the offender shall be
fined five thousand dollars and imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not less
than ten years nor more than thirty years. Two years of the sentence of
imprisonment shall be imposed without benefit of parole, probation, or suspension
of sentence. Except in compliance with R.S. 14:98.5(B)(1), the mandatory minimum
sentence cannot be served on home incarceration.
* * *
C. If the offender has previously been convicted for the crime of vehicular
homicide in violation of R.S. 14:32.1, third degree feticide in violation of R.S.
14:32.8, or first degree vehicular negligent injuring in violation of R.S. 14:39.2, or
an equivalent law or laws of any state, then on a conviction of a fourth or subsequent
offense violation of R.S. 14:98, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary and regardless of whether the offense occurred before or after an earlier
conviction, the offender shall be fined five thousand dollars and imprisoned, with or
without hard labor, for not less than twelve years nor more than thirty years. No part
of the sentence shall be imposed with benefit of parole, probation, or suspension of
sentence, and no portion of the sentence shall be imposed concurrently with the
remaining balance of any sentence to be served for a prior conviction for any
offense.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 82 ENROLLED
C. D. If the offender has previously received the benefit of parole, probation,
or suspension of sentence on a conviction of a fourth or subsequent offense violation
of R.S. 14:98, then on a subsequent conviction of a fourth or subsequent offense,
notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and regardless of whether
the offense occurred before or after an earlier conviction, the offender shall be fined
five thousand dollars and imprisoned at hard labor for not less than ten nor more than
thirty years. No part of the sentence shall be imposed with benefit of parole,
probation, or suspension of sentence, and no portion of the sentence shall be imposed
concurrently with the remaining balance of any sentence to be served for a prior
conviction for any offense.
D. E. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order, upon motion of
the prosecuting district attorney, that the vehicle being operated by the offender at
the time of the offense be seized and impounded, and sold at auction in accordance
with the provisions of R.S. 14:98(F).
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.